Utah statutes.
76-6-101.   Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1)  "Property" means any form of real property or tangible personal property
which is capable of being damaged or destroyed and includes a habitable
structure.
(2)  "Habitable structure" means any building, vehicle, trailer, railway car,
aircraft, or watercraft used for lodging or assembling persons or conducting
business whether a person is actually present or not.
(3)  "Property" is that of another, if anyone other than the actor has a
possessory or proprietary interest in any portion thereof.
(4)  "Value" means:
(a)  The market value of the property, if totally destroyed, at the time and
place of the offense, or where cost of replacement exceeds the market value;
or
(b)  Where the market value cannot be ascertained, the cost of repairing or
replacing the property within a reasonable time following the offense.
(5)  If the property damaged has a value that cannot be ascertained by the
criteria set forth in Subsections (4)(a) and (b), the property shall be
considered to have a value less than $300.
(6)  "Fire" means a flame, heat source capable of combustion, or material
capable of combustion that is caused, set, or maintained by a person for any
purpose.
